Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 364.09, is amended to read: 364.09 EXCEPTIONS. (a) This chapter does not apply to the licensing process for peace officers; to law enforcement agencies as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f); to fire protection agencies; to eligibility for a private detective or protective agent license; to the licensing and background study process under chapters 245A and 245C; to the licensing and background investigation process under chapter 240; to eligibility for school bus driver endorsements; to eligibility for special transportation service endorsements; to eligibility for a commercial driver training instructor license, which is governed by section 171.35 and rules adopted under that section; to emergency medical services personnel, or to the licensing by political subdivisions of taxicab drivers, if the applicant for the license has been discharged from sentence for a conviction within the ten years immediately preceding application of a violation of any of the following: (1) sections 609.185 to 609.2114, 609.221 to 609.223, 609.342 to 609.3451, or 617.23, subdivision 2 or 3; or Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21; (2) any provision of chapter 152 that is punishable by a maximum sentence of 15 years or more; or (3) a violation of chapter 169 or 169A involving driving under the influence, leaving the scene of an accident, or reckless or careless driving. This chapter also shall not apply to eligibility for juvenile corrections employment, where the offense involved child physical or sexual abuse or criminal sexual conduct. (b) This chapter does not apply to a school district or to eligibility for a license issued or renewed by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board or the commissioner of education. (c) Nothing in this section precludes the Minnesota Police and Peace Officers Training Board or the state fire marshal from recommending policies set forth in this chapter to the attorney general for adoption in the attorney general's discretion to apply to law enforcement or fire protection agencies. (d) This chapter does not apply to a license to practice medicine that has been denied or revoked by the Board of Medical Practice pursuant to section 147.091, subdivision 1a. (e) This chapter does not apply to any person who has been denied a license to practice chiropractic or whose license to practice chiropractic has been revoked by the board in accordance with section 148.10, subdivision 7. (f) This chapter does not apply to any license, registration, or permit that has been denied or revoked by the Board of Nursing in accordance with section 148.261, subdivision 1a. (g) This chapter does not apply to any license, registration, permit, or certificate that has been denied or revoked by the commissioner of health according to section 148.5195, subdivision 5; or 153A.15, subdivision 2. new text begin (h) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Office of the Legislative Auditor or the state auditor, in connection with evaluation of final candidates for employment, shall be permitted to access and consider records of convictions that have been expunged and to disqualify from employment any person solely or in part because of a prior conviction directly related to the position of employment. new text end deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i) new text end This chapter does not supersede a requirement under law to conduct a criminal history background investigation or consider criminal history records in hiring for particular types of employment. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609A.03, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Limitations of order effective January 1, 2015, and later. (a) Upon issuance of an expungement order related to a charge supported by probable cause, the DNA samples and DNA records held by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension and collected under authority other than section 299C.105 shall not be sealed, returned to the subject of the record, or destroyed. (b) Notwithstanding the issuance of an expungement order: (1) except as provided in clause (2), an expunged record may be opened, used, or exchanged between criminal justice agencies without a court order for the purposes of initiating, furthering, or completing a criminal investigation or prosecution or for sentencing purposes or providing probation or other correctional services; (2) when a criminal justice agency seeks access to a record that was sealed under section 609A.02, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (1), after an acquittal or a court order dismissing for lack of probable cause, for purposes of a criminal investigation, prosecution, or sentencing, the requesting agency must obtain an ex parte court order after stating a good-faith basis to believe that opening the record may lead to relevant information; (3) an expunged record of a conviction may be opened for purposes of evaluating a prospective employee in a criminal justice agency without a court order; (4) an expunged record of a conviction may be opened for purposes of a background study under section 245C.08 unless the commissioner had been properly served with notice of the petition for expungement and the court order for expungement is directed specifically to the commissioner of human services following proper service of a petition, or following proceedings under section 609A.017, 609A.025, or 609A.035 upon service of an order to the commissioner of human services; (5) an expunged record of a conviction may be opened for purposes of a background check required under section 122A.18, subdivision 8, unless the court order for expungement is directed specifically to the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board; new text begin (6) an expunged record of a conviction may be opened for purposes of evaluating final candidates for employment with the Office of Legislative Auditor or the state auditor without a court order; new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end the court may order an expunged record opened upon request by the victim of the underlying offense if the court determines that the record is substantially related to a matter for which the victim is before the court; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end a prosecutor may request, and the district court shall provide, certified records of conviction for a record expunged pursuant to sections 609A.015, 609A.017, 609A.02, 609A.025, and 609A.035, and the certified records of conviction may be disclosed and introduced in criminal court proceedings as provided by the rules of court and applicable law; and deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end the subject of an expunged record may request, and the court shall provide, certified or uncertified records of conviction for a record expunged pursuant to sections 609A.015, 609A.017, 609A.02, 609A.025, and 609A.035. (c) An agency or jurisdiction subject to an expungement order shall maintain the record in a manner that provides access to the record by a criminal justice agency under paragraph (b), clause (1) or (2), but notifies the recipient that the record has been sealed. The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall notify the commissioner of human services or the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board of the existence of a sealed record and of the right to obtain access under paragraph (b), clause (4) or (5). Upon request, the agency or jurisdiction subject to the expungement order shall provide access to the record to the commissioner of human services or the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board under paragraph (b), clause (4) or (5). (d) An expunged record that is opened or exchanged under this subdivision remains subject to the expungement order in the hands of the person receiving the record. (e) A criminal justice agency that receives an expunged record under paragraph (b), clause (1) or (2), must maintain and store the record in a manner that restricts the use of the record to the investigation, prosecution, or sentencing for which it was obtained. (f) For purposes of this section, a "criminal justice agency" means a court or government agency that performs the administration of criminal justice under statutory authority. (g) This subdivision applies to expungement orders subject to its limitations and effective on or after January 1, 2015, and grants of expungement relief issued on or after January 1, 2025.